Missouri, session 2026, SB1105.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 620, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
seven new sections, to be known as sections 620.2030, 620.2032,
620.2034, 620.2035, 620.2036, 620.2038, and 620.2040, to read
as follows:
620.2030. 1. Sections 620.2030 to 620.2040 shall be
known and may be cited as the "Rural Workforce Housing
Investment Act".
2. For purposes of sections 620.2030 to 620.2040, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of economic
development;
(2) "Director", the director of the department of
economic development;
(3) "Eligible activities of a nonprofit development
organization":
(a) New construction of owner-occupied or rental
housing in a community with demonstrated workforce housing
needs;
(b) Substantial repair or rehabilitation of
dilapidated housing stock; or

SB 1105 2
(c) Upper-story housing development;
(4) "Matching funds", dollars contributed by
individuals, businesses, foundations, local and regional
political subdivisions, or other nonprofit organizations to
a workforce housing investment fund administered by a
nonprofit development organization;
(5) "Nonprofit development organization", a regional
or statewide nonprofit development organization approved by
the director;
(6) "Qualified activities", include, but are not
limited to, purchase and rental guarantees, loan guarantees,
loan participations, and other credit enhancements, or any
other form of assistance designed to reduce the cost of
workforce housing related to eligible activities of the
nonprofit development organization;
(7) "Qualified investment", a cash investment in a
workforce housing investment fund administered by a
nonprofit development organization;
(8) "Rural community", any city or county with a
population of fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants as
determined by the most recent federal decennial census;
(9) "Workforce housing":
(a) Housing that meets the needs of modern working
families;
(b) Housing that is attractive to new residents
considering relocation to a rural community;
(c) Owner-occupied housing units that cost not more
than two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars per unit to
construct or rental housing units that cost not more than
two hundred thousand dollars per unit to construct. For
purposes of this subdivision, housing unit costs shall be
updated annually by the department based upon the most

SB 1105 3
recent increase or decrease in the Producer Price Index for
all commodities, published by the United States Department
of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics;
(d) Owner-occupied and rental housing units for which
the cost to substantially rehabilitate exceeds fifty percent
of a unit's assessed value;
(e) Upper-story housing; and
(f) Housing that does not receive federal or state low-
income housing tax credits, community development block
grants, or loans or grants from the Missouri housing trust
fund under section 215.034;
(10) "Workforce housing investment fund", a fund that
has been created by a nonprofit development organization and
certified by the department to encourage development of
workforce housing in rural communities.
620.2032. 1. There shall be established within the
department of economic development a workforce housing grant
program to foster and support the development of workforce
housing in rural communities.
2. A nonprofit development organization may apply to
the department for approval of a workforce housing grant for
the creation of a workforce housing investment fund. The
application shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the
director. For fiscal years ending on or before June 30,
2029, grants shall be awarded by the director on a
competitive basis until grant funds are no longer
available. Grant maximums shall not exceed one million
dollars to any one nonprofit development organization over a
two-year period, with no more than two million dollars
cumulative for any single grantee for all fiscal years
ending on or before June 30, 2029. Grants shall require a
minimum one-to-one in matching funds to be considered a

SB 1105 4
qualified grant application. Unallocated workforce housing
grant funds held by the department shall be available to be
awarded in the next program year.
3. Grants shall be awarded based upon:
(1) A demonstrated and ongoing housing need as
identified by a recent housing study;
(2) A community or region that has a low unemployment
rate and is having difficulty attracting workers and filling
employment positions;
(3) A community or region that exhibits a demonstrated
commitment to growing its housing stock;
(4) Projects that can reasonably be ready for
occupancy in a period of twenty-four months; and
(5) A demonstrated ability to grow and manage a
workforce housing investment fund.
4. A workforce housing investment fund shall be
required to receive annual certification from the department.
5. A nonprofit development organization shall:
(1) Invest or intend to invest in workforce housing
eligible activities;
(2) Use any fees, interest, loan repayments, or other
funds it receives as a result of the administration of the
grant to support qualified activities; and
(3) Have an active board of directors with expertise
in development, construction, and finance that meets at
least quarterly to approve all qualified investments made by
the nonprofit development organization. A nonprofit
development organization shall have a formal plan and proven
expertise to invest unused workforce housing investment fund
balances and shall have an annual audit of all financial
records conducted by an independent certified public
accountant.

SB 1105 5
620.2034. 1. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund",
which shall consist of moneys appropriated to the fund by
the general assembly. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation,
moneys in this fund shall be used solely as provided in
sections 620.2030 to 620.2040. The department shall
administer the fund and may seek additional private funds,
nonstate funds, or funds from other interested parties to
use in the workforce housing grant program.
2. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the
contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the
biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general
revenue fund.
3. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund
in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
620.2035. 1. If a nonprofit development organization
fails to engage in the initial qualified activity within
twenty-four months after receiving initial grant funding,
the nonprofit development organization shall return the
grant funds to the department for credit to the rural
workforce housing investment fund established under section
620.2034.
2. If a nonprofit development organization fails to
allocate any remaining initial grant funding on a qualified
activity within twenty-four months after engaging in the
initial qualified activity, the nonprofit development
organization shall return such unallocated grant funds to

SB 1105 6
the department for credit to the rural workforce housing
investment fund established under section 620.2034.
3. The director shall have discretion to transfer any
unused funds to any qualifying trust or fund before August
28, 2031. Beginning August 28, 2031, any funds held by the
department and not designated by the director to be
disbursed to an alternative trust or fund shall be
transferred to the Missouri housing trust fund established
under section 215.034.
620.2036. 1. Each nonprofit development organization
shall submit an annual status report to the director. The
report shall certify that the nonprofit development
organization meets the requirements of sections 620.2030 to
620.2040 and shall include a breakdown of program activities.
2. The annual report shall include, but not be limited
to:
(1) The name and geographical location of the
reporting nonprofit development organization;
(2) The number, amount, and type of workforce housing
investment funds invested in qualified activities;
(3) The number, geographical location, type, and
amount of investments made;
(4) A summary of matching funds and where such
matching funds were generated; and
(5) The results of the annual audit required under
subsection 5 of section 620.2032.
3. If a nonprofit development organization ceases
administration of a workforce housing investment fund, it
shall file a final report with the director in a form and
manner required by the director. Before August 28, 2031,
any unallocated grant funds shall be returned to the
department for credit to the rural workforce housing

SB 1105 7
investment fund. Beginning August 28, 2031, any unallocated
grant funds shall be returned to the department for credit
to the Missouri housing trust fund established under section
215.034.
4. If a nonprofit development organization fails to
file a complete annual report by February fifteenth, the
director may, in his or her discretion, impose a civil
penalty of not more than five thousand dollars for such
violation. All moneys collected by the department under
this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer for
distribution in accordance with Article IX, Section 7 of the
Constitution of Missouri.
620.2038. 1. The department shall use its best
efforts to ensure that grant funds awarded to nonprofit
development organizations are targeted to the geographic
communities or regions with the most pressing economic and
employment needs.
2. The department shall use its best efforts to ensure
that the allocation of grant funds provides equitable access
to the benefits provided by sections 620.2030 to 620.2040 to
all eligible geographical areas.
3. The department may contract with a statewide public
or private nonprofit organization that shall serve as agent
for the department to help carry out the purposes and
requirements of sections 620.2030 to 620.2040. The
department or its agent shall use for expenses only that
portion of the funds available for the workforce housing
grant program through the rural workforce housing investment
fund necessary to cover the actual costs of administering
the program including, but not limited to, the hiring of
staff.

SB 1105 8
620.2040. 1. The department shall submit an annual
status report to the general assembly and the governor that
includes, but is not limited to:
(1) The number and geographical location of nonprofit
development organizations establishing workforce housing
investment funds;
(2) The number, amount, and type of workforce housing
investment funds invested in qualified activities; and
(3) The number, geographical location, type, and
amount of investments made by each nonprofit development
organization.
2. The report to the general assembly shall be
submitted electronically.
3. Information received, developed, created, or
otherwise maintained by the department in administering and
enforcing sections 620.2030 to 620.2040, other than
information required to be included in the report to be
submitted by the department to the governor and the general
assembly under this section, may be deemed confidential by
the department and not considered public records subject to
disclosure under chapter 610.
4. The director may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of sections 620.2030 to
620.2040. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently

SB 1105 9
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓